Ohio, session 136, HB693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2151.412, 2151.426, 3109.04, 3109.054, and 3129.01 be amended and sections 2151.032, 3129.10, 3129.11, 3129.12, 3129.13, 3129.14, 3129.15, 3129.21, 3129.211, 3129.22, 3129.23, 3129.24, 3129.25, 3129.26, 3129.30, 3129.301, 3129.35, 3129.351, and 4743.15 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2151.032. (A) In no event shall recognizing or affirming a child's sex be considered any of the following: (1) Abuse, neglect, or risk thereof; (2) As contrary to the best interest of the child; (3) As creating an unsafe environment for the child. (B) Division (A) of this section applies in any circumstance regarding the abuse or neglect, the best interest, or the well-being of a child, including relevant provisions of Chapter 2151., 2919., or 3109. of the Revised Code. (C) "Affirming a child's sex" has the same meaning as in section 3129.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.412. (A) Each public children services agency and private child placing agency shall prepare and maintain a case plan for any child to whom the agency is providing services and to whom any of the following applies: (1) The agency filed a complaint pursuant to section 2151.27 of the Revised Code alleging that the child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) The agency has temporary or permanent custody of the child; (3) The child is living at home subject to an order for protective supervision; (4) The child is in a planned permanent living arrangement. Except as provided by division (A)(2) of section 5103.153 of the Revised Code, a private child placing agency providing services to a child who is the subject of a voluntary permanent custody surrender agreement entered into under division (B)(4) of section 5103.15 of the Revised Code is not required to prepare and maintain a case plan for that child. (B) Each public children services agency shall prepare and maintain a case plan for any child for whom the agency is providing in-home services pursuant to an alternative response. (C)(1) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code setting forth the content and format of case plans required by division (A) of this section and establishing procedures for developing, implementing, and changing the case plans. The rules shall at a minimum comply with the requirements of Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 670, et seq. (1980). (2) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code requiring public children services agencies and private child placing agencies to maintain case plans for children and their families who are receiving services in their homes from the agencies and for whom case plans are not required by division (A) of this section. The rules for public children services agencies shall include the requirements for case plans maintained for children and their families who are receiving services in their homes from public children services agencies pursuant to an alternative response. The agencies shall maintain case plans as required by those rules; however, the case plans shall not be subject to any other provision of this section except as specifically required by the rules. (D) Each public children services agency and private child placing agency that is required by division (A) of this section to maintain a case plan shall file the case plan with the court prior to the child's adjudicatory hearing but no later than thirty days after the earlier of the date on which the complaint in the case was filed or the child was first placed into shelter care. If the agency does not have sufficient information prior to the adjudicatory hearing to complete any part of the case plan, the agency shall specify in the case plan the additional information necessary to complete each part of the case plan and the steps that will be taken to obtain that information. All parts of the case plan shall be completed by the earlier of thirty days after the adjudicatory hearing or the date of the dispositional hearing for the child. (E) Any agency that is required by division (A) of this section to prepare a case plan shall attempt to obtain an agreement among all parties, including, but not limited to, the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child and the guardian ad litem of the child regarding the content of the case plan. If all parties agree to the content of the case plan and the court approves it, the court shall journalize it as part of its dispositional order. If the agency cannot obtain an agreement upon the contents of the case plan or the court does not approve it, the parties shall present evidence on the contents of the case plan at the dispositional hearing. The court, based upon the evidence presented at the dispositional hearing and the best interest of the child, shall determine the contents of the case plan and journalize it as part of the dispositional order for the child. (F)(1) All parties, including the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child, are bound by the terms of the journalized case plan. A party that fails to comply with the terms of the journalized case plan may be held in contempt of court. (2) Any party may propose a change to a substantive part of the case plan, including, but not limited to, the child's placement and the visitation rights of any party. A party proposing a change to the case plan shall file the proposed change with the court and give notice of the proposed change in writing before the end of the day after the day of filing it to all parties and the child's guardian ad litem. All parties and the guardian ad litem shall have seven days from the date the notice is sent to object to and request a hearing on the proposed change. (a) If it receives a timely request for a hearing, the court shall schedule a hearing pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held no later than thirty days after the request is received by the court. The court shall give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem. The agency may implement the proposed change after the hearing, if the court approves it. The agency shall not implement the proposed change unless it is approved by the court. (b) If it does not receive a timely request for a hearing, the court may approve the proposed change without a hearing. If the court approves the proposed change without a hearing, it shall journalize the case plan with the change not later than fourteen days after the change is filed with the court. If the court does not approve the proposed change to the case plan, it shall schedule a hearing to be held pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code no later than thirty days after the expiration of the fourteen-day time period and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child. If, despite the requirements of division (F)(2) of this section, the court neither approves and journalizes the proposed change nor conducts a hearing, the agency may implement the proposed change not earlier than fifteen days after it is submitted to the court. (3) If an agency has reasonable cause to believe that a child is suffering from illness or injury and is not receiving proper care and that an appropriate change in the child's case plan is necessary to prevent immediate or threatened physical or emotional harm, to believe that a child is in immediate danger from the child's surroundings and that an immediate change in the child's case plan is necessary to prevent immediate or threatened physical or emotional harm to the child, or to believe that a parent, guardian, custodian, or other member of the child's household has abused or neglected the child and that the child is in danger of immediate or threatened physical or emotional harm from that person unless the agency makes an appropriate change in the child's case plan, it may implement the change without prior agreement or a court hearing and, before the end of the next day after the change is made, give all parties, the guardian ad litem of the child, and the court notice of the change. Before the end of the third day after implementing the change in the case plan, the agency shall file a statement of the change with the court and give notice of the filing accompanied by a copy of the statement to all parties and the guardian ad litem. All parties and the guardian ad litem shall have ten days from the date the notice is sent to object to and request a hearing on the change. (a) If it receives a timely request for a hearing, the court shall schedule a hearing pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held no later than thirty days after the request is received by the court. The court shall give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem. The agency shall continue to administer the case plan with the change after the hearing, if the court approves the change. If the court does not approve the change, the court shall make appropriate changes to the case plan and shall journalize the case plan. (b) If it does not receive a timely request for a hearing, the court may approve the change without a hearing. If the court approves the change without a hearing, it shall journalize the case plan with the change within fourteen days after receipt of the change. If the court does not approve the change to the case plan, it shall schedule a hearing under section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held no later than thirty days after the expiration of the fourteen-day time period and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child. (G)(1) All case plans for children in temporary custody shall have the following general goals: (a) Consistent with the best interest and special needs of the child, to achieve a safe out-of-home placement in the least restrictive, most family-like setting available and in close proximity to the home from which the child was removed or the home in which the child will be permanently placed; (b) To eliminate with all due speed the need for the out-of-home placement so that the child can safely return home. (2) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code setting forth the general goals of case plans for children subject to dispositional orders for protective supervision, a planned permanent living arrangement, or permanent custody. (H) In the agency's development of a case plan and the court's review of the case plan, the child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern. The agency and the court shall be guided by the following general priorities: (1) A child who is residing with or can be placed with the child's parents within a reasonable time should remain in their legal custody even if an order of protective supervision is required for a reasonable period of time; (2) If both parents of the child have abandoned the child, have relinquished custody of the child, have become incapable of supporting or caring for the child even with reasonable assistance, or have a detrimental effect on the health, safety, and best interest of the child, the child should be placed in the legal custody of a suitable member of the child's extended family; (3) If a child described in division (H)(2) of this section has no suitable member of the child's extended family to accept legal custody, the child should be placed in the legal custody of a suitable nonrelative who shall be made a party to the proceedings after being given legal custody of the child; (4) If the child has no suitable member of the child's extended family to accept legal custody of the child and no suitable nonrelative is available to accept legal custody of the child and, if the child temporarily cannot or should not be placed with the child's parents, guardian, or custodian, the child should be placed in the temporary custody of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency; (5) If the child cannot be placed with either of the child's parents within a reasonable period of time or should not be placed with either, if no suitable member of the child's extended family or suitable nonrelative is available to accept legal custody of the child, and if the agency has a reasonable expectation of placing the child for adoption, the child should be committed to the permanent custody of the public children services agency or private child placing agency; (6) If the child is to be placed for adoption or foster care, the placement shall not be delayed or denied on the basis of the child's or adoptive or foster family's race, color, or national origin. (I) The case plan for a child in temporary custody shall include at a minimum the following requirements if the child is or has been the victim of abuse or neglect or if the child witnessed the commission in the child's household of abuse or neglect against a sibling of the child, a parent of the child, or any other person in the child's household: (1) A requirement that the child's parents, guardian, or custodian participate in mandatory counseling; (2) A requirement that the child's parents, guardian, or custodian participate in any supportive services that are required by or provided pursuant to the child's case plan. (J)(1) Prior to January 1, 2023, a case plan for a child in temporary custody may include, as a supplement, a plan for locating a permanent family placement. The supplement shall not be considered part of the case plan for purposes of division (E) of this section. (2) On and after January 1, 2023, a case plan for a child in temporary custody shall include a permanency plan for the child unless it is documented that such a plan would not be in the best interest of the child. The permanency plan shall describe the services the agency shall provide to achieve permanency for the child if reasonable efforts to return the child to the child's home, or eliminate the continued removal from that home, are unsuccessful. Those services shall be provided concurrently with reasonable efforts to return the child home or eliminate the child's continued removal from home. (3) The director of children and youth, pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of division (J) of this section. (K)(1) A public children services agency may request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check with respect to a parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement whose actions result in a finding after the filing of a complaint as described in division (A)(1) of this section that a child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child. The public children services agency shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check. (2) At any time on or after the date that is ninety days after September 10, 2012, a prosecuting attorney, or an assistant prosecuting attorney appointed under section 309.06 of the Revised Code, may request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check with respect to each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement whose actions resulted in a finding after the filing of a complaint described in division (A)(1) of this section that a child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child. Each prosecuting attorney or assistant prosecuting attorney who makes such a request shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check for each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement who is a subject of the request. (3) A public children services agency, prosecuting attorney, or assistant prosecuting attorney that requests a criminal records check under division (K)(1) or (2) of this section shall do both of the following: (a) Provide to each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement for whom a criminal records check is requested a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard fingerprint impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section and obtain the completed form and impression sheet from the parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement; (b) Forward the completed form and impression sheet to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (4) A parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement who is given a form and fingerprint impression sheet under division (K)(3)(a) of this section and who fails to complete the form or provide fingerprint impressions may be held in contempt of court. (L)(1) No case plan shall require a party to a case plan, including the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child, to consent to or facilitate social or medical, including surgical, interventions counter to affirming a child's sex or to restrict or prohibit a parent, guardian, or legal custodian from affirming a child's sex. (2) As used in division (L) of this section, "affirming a child's sex" and "affirm a child's sex" have the same meanings as in section 3129.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.426. (A)(1) A children's advocacy center may be established to serve a single county by execution of a memorandum of understanding regarding the participation in the operation of the center by any of the following entities in the county to be served by the center: (a) The public children services agency; (b) Representatives of any county or municipal law enforcement agencies serving the county that investigate any of the types of abuse specified in the memorandum of understanding creating the center as being within the center's jurisdiction; (c) The prosecuting attorney of the county or a village solicitor, city director of law, or similar chief legal officer of a municipal corporation in the county who prosecutes any of the types of abuse specified in the memorandum of understanding creating the center as being within the center's jurisdiction in the area to be served by the center; (d) Any other entity considered appropriate by all of the other entities executing the memorandum. (2) A children's advocacy center may be established to serve two or more contiguous counties if a memorandum of understanding regarding the participation in the operation of the center is executed by any of the entities described in division (A)(1) of this section in each county to be served by the center. (3) Any memorandum of understanding executed under this section may include a provision that specifies types of abuse of a child, in addition to sexual abuse of a child, that are to be within the jurisdiction of the children's advocacy center created as a result of the execution of the memorandum. If a memorandum of understanding executed under this section does not include any provision of that nature, the children's advocacy center created as a result of the execution of the memorandum has jurisdiction only in relation to reports of alleged sexual abuse of a child. (B) Each entity that participates in the execution of a memorandum of understanding under this section shall cooperate in all of the following: (1) Developing a multidisciplinary team pursuant to section 2151.427 of the Revised Code to perform the functions and activities and provide the services specified in the interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code, regarding reports received under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code of alleged sexual abuse of a child and reports of allegations of another type of abuse of a child that is specified in the memorandum of understanding that creates the center as being within the center's jurisdiction, and regarding the children who are the subjects of the reports; (2) Participating in the operation of the center in compliance a manner consistent with standards for full membership established by the national children's alliance, except for any qualifications or training that violates section 3129.26 of the Revised Code; (3) Employing the center's staff. (C) A center shall do both of the following: (1) Operate in accordance with sections 2151.427 and 2151.428 of the Revised Code, the interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code relative to the center, and consistent with the standards for full membership established by the national children's alliance, provided that compliance under this division does not violate sections 3129.10 to 3129.351 of the Revised Code; (2) Register annually with the attorney general. Sec. 3109.04. (A) In any divorce, legal separation, or annulment proceeding and in any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child, upon hearing the testimony of either or both parents and considering any mediation report filed pursuant to section 3109.052 of the Revised Code and in accordance with sections 3127.01 to 3127.53 of the Revised Code, the court shall allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the minor children of the marriage. Subject to division (D)(2) of this section, the court may allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children in either of the following ways: (1) If neither parent files a pleading or motion in accordance with division (G) of this section, if at least one parent files a pleading or motion under that division but no parent who filed a pleading or motion under that division also files a plan for shared parenting, or if at least one parent files both a pleading or motion and a shared parenting plan under that division but no plan for shared parenting is in the best interest of the children, the court, in a manner consistent with the best interest of the children, shall allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children primarily to one of the parents, designate that parent as the residential parent and the legal custodian of the child, and divide between the parents the other rights and responsibilities for the care of the children, including, but not limited to, the responsibility to provide support for the children and the right of the parent who is not the residential parent to have continuing contact with the children. (2) If at least one parent files a pleading or motion in accordance with division (G) of this section and a plan for shared parenting pursuant to that division and if a plan for shared parenting is in the best interest of the children and is approved by the court in accordance with division (D)(1) of this section, the court may allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children to both parents and issue a shared parenting order requiring the parents to share all or some of the aspects of the physical and legal care of the children in accordance with the approved plan for shared parenting. If the court issues a shared parenting order under this division and it is necessary for the purpose of receiving public assistance, the court shall designate which one of the parents' residences is to serve as the child's home. The child support obligations of the parents under a shared parenting order issued under this division shall be determined in accordance with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code. (B)(1) When making the allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children under this section in an original proceeding or in any proceeding for modification of a prior order of the court making the allocation, the court shall take into account that which would be in the best interest of the children. In determining the child's best interest for purposes of making its allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and for purposes of resolving any issues related to the making of that allocation, the court, in its discretion, may and, upon the request of either party, shall interview in chambers any or all of the involved children regarding their wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation. (2) If the court interviews any child pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) The court, in its discretion, may and, upon the motion of either parent, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child. (b) The court first shall determine the reasoning ability of the child. If the court determines that the child does not have sufficient reasoning ability to express the child's wishes and concern with respect to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child, it shall not determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation. If the court determines that the child has sufficient reasoning ability to express the child's wishes or concerns with respect to the allocation, it then shall determine whether, because of special circumstances, it would not be in the best interest of the child to determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation. If the court determines that, because of special circumstances, it would not be in the best interest of the child to determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation, it shall not determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation and shall enter its written findings of fact and opinion in the journal. If the court determines that it would be in the best interests of the child to determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation, it shall proceed to make that determination. (c) The interview shall be conducted in chambers, and no person other than the child, the child's attorney, the judge, any necessary court personnel, and, in the judge's discretion, the attorney of each parent shall be permitted to be present in the chambers during the interview. (3) No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain from a child a written or recorded statement or affidavit setting forth the child's wishes and concerns regarding the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities concerning the child. No court, in determining the child's best interest for purposes of making its allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child or for purposes of resolving any issues related to the making of that allocation, shall accept or consider a written or recorded statement or affidavit that purports to set forth the child's wishes and concerns regarding those matters. (C) Prior to trial, the court may cause an investigation to be made as to the character, family relations, past conduct, earning ability, and financial worth of each parent and may order the parents and their minor children to submit to medical, psychological, and psychiatric examinations. The report of the investigation and examinations shall be made available to either parent or the parent's counsel of record not less than five days before trial, upon written request. The report shall be signed by the investigator, and the investigator shall be subject to cross-examination by either parent concerning the contents of the report. The court may tax as costs all or any part of the expenses for each investigation. If the court determines that either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being a neglected child, that either parent previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the neglectful act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is a neglected child, or that there is reason to believe that either parent has acted in a manner resulting in a child being a neglected child, the court shall consider that fact against naming that parent the residential parent and against granting a shared parenting decree. When the court allocates parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children or determines whether to grant shared parenting in any proceeding, it shall consider whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any sexually oriented offense or other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child. If the court determines that either parent has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any sexually oriented offense or other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child, it may designate that parent as the residential parent and may issue a shared parenting decree or order only if it determines that it is in the best interest of the child to name that parent the residential parent or to issue a shared parenting decree or order and it makes specific written findings of fact to support its determination. (D)(1)(a) Upon the filing of a pleading or motion by either parent or both parents, in accordance with division (G) of this section, requesting shared parenting and the filing of a shared parenting plan in accordance with that division, the court shall comply with division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, whichever is applicable: (i) If both parents jointly make the request in their pleadings or jointly file the motion and also jointly file the plan, the court shall review the parents' plan to determine if it is in the best interest of the children. If the court determines that the plan is in the best interest of the children, the court shall approve it. If the court determines that the plan or any part of the plan is not in the best interest of the children, the court shall require the parents to make appropriate changes to the plan to meet the court's objections to it. If changes to the plan are made to meet the court's objections, and if the new plan is in the best interest of the children, the court shall approve the plan. If changes to the plan are not made to meet the court's objections, or if the parents attempt to make changes to the plan to meet the court's objections, but the court determines that the new plan or any part of the new plan still is not in the best interest of the children, the court may reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny their motion requesting shared parenting of the children and proceed as if the request in the pleadings or the motion had not been made. The court shall not approve a plan under this division unless it determines that the plan is in the best interest of the children. (ii) If each parent makes a request in the parent's pleadings or files a motion and each also files a separate plan, the court shall review each plan filed to determine if either is in the best interest of the children. If the court determines that one of the filed plans is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan. If the court determines that neither filed plan is in the best interest of the children, the court may order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the parent's plan or both of the filed plans to meet the court's objections, or may select one of the filed plans and order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the selected plan to meet the court's objections. If changes to the plan or plans are submitted to meet the court's objections, and if any of the filed plans with the changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan with the changes. If changes to the plan or plans are not submitted to meet the court's objections, or if the parents submit changes to the plan or plans to meet the court's objections but the court determines that none of the filed plans with the submitted changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny their motions requesting shared parenting of the children and proceed as if the requests in the pleadings or the motions had not been made. If the court approves a plan under this division, either as originally filed or with submitted changes, or if the court rejects the portion of the parents' pleadings or denies their motions requesting shared parenting under this division and proceeds as if the requests in the pleadings or the motions had not been made, the court shall enter in the record of the case findings of fact and conclusions of law as to the reasons for the approval or the rejection or denial. Division (D)(1)(b) of this section applies in relation to the approval or disapproval of a plan under this division. (iii) If each parent makes a request in the parent's pleadings or files a motion but only one parent files a plan, or if only one parent makes a request in the parent's pleadings or files a motion and also files a plan, the court in the best interest of the children may order the other parent to file a plan for shared parenting in accordance with division (G) of this section. The court shall review each plan filed to determine if any plan is in the best interest of the children. If the court determines that one of the filed plans is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan. If the court determines that no filed plan is in the best interest of the children, the court may order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the parent's plan or both of the filed plans to meet the court's objections or may select one filed plan and order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the selected plan to meet the court's objections. If changes to the plan or plans are submitted to meet the court's objections, and if any of the filed plans with the changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan with the changes. If changes to the plan or plans are not submitted to meet the court's objections, or if the parents submit changes to the plan or plans to meet the court's objections but the court determines that none of the filed plans with the submitted changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny the parents' motion or reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny their motions requesting shared parenting of the children and proceed as if the request or requests or the motion or motions had not been made. If the court approves a plan under this division, either as originally filed or with submitted changes, or if the court rejects the portion of the pleadings or denies the motion or motions requesting shared parenting under this division and proceeds as if the request or requests or the motion or motions had not been made, the court shall enter in the record of the case findings of fact and conclusions of law as to the reasons for the approval or the rejection or denial. Division (D)(1)(b) of this section applies in relation to the approval or disapproval of a plan under this division. (b) The approval of a plan under division (D)(1)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section is discretionary with the court. The court shall not approve more than one plan under either division and shall not approve a plan under either division unless it determines that the plan is in the best interest of the children. If the court, under either division, does not determine that any filed plan or any filed plan with submitted changes is in the best interest of the children, the court shall not approve any plan. (c) Whenever possible, the court shall require that a shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section ensure the opportunity for both parents to have frequent and continuing contact with the child, unless frequent and continuing contact with any parent would not be in the best interest of the child. (d) If a court approves a shared parenting plan under division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, the approved plan shall be incorporated into a final shared parenting decree granting the parents the shared parenting of the children. Any final shared parenting decree shall be issued at the same time as and shall be appended to the final decree of dissolution, divorce, annulment, or legal separation arising out of the action out of which the question of the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children arose. No provisional shared parenting decree shall be issued in relation to any shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section. A final shared parenting decree issued under this division has immediate effect as a final decree on the date of its issuance, subject to modification or termination as authorized by this section. (2) If the court finds, with respect to any child under eighteen years of age, that it is in the best interest of the child for neither parent to be designated the residential parent and legal custodian of the child, it may commit the child to a relative of the child or certify a copy of its findings, together with as much of the record and the further information, in narrative form or otherwise, that it considers necessary or as the juvenile court requests, to the juvenile court for further proceedings, and, upon the certification, the juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction. (E)(1)(a) The court shall not modify a prior decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children unless it finds, based on facts that have arisen since the prior decree or that were unknown to the court at the time of the prior decree, that a change has occurred in the circumstances of the child, the child's residential parent, or either of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree, and that the modification is necessary to serve the best interest of the child. In applying these standards, the court shall retain the residential parent designated by the prior decree or the prior shared parenting decree, unless a modification is in the best interest of the child and one of the following applies: (i) The residential parent agrees to a change in the residential parent or both parents under a shared parenting decree agree to a change in the designation of residential parent. (ii) The child, with the consent of the residential parent or of both parents under a shared parenting decree, has been integrated into the family of the person seeking to become the residential parent. (iii) The harm likely to be caused by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantages of the change of environment to the child. (b) One or both of the parents under a prior decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children that is not a shared parenting decree may file a motion requesting that the prior decree be modified to give both parents shared rights and responsibilities for the care of the children. The motion shall include both a request for modification of the prior decree and a request for a shared parenting order that complies with division (G) of this section. Upon the filing of the motion, if the court determines that a modification of the prior decree is authorized under division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the court may modify the prior decree to grant a shared parenting order, provided that the court shall not modify the prior decree to grant a shared parenting order unless the court complies with divisions (A) and (D)(1) of this section and, in accordance with those divisions, approves the submitted shared parenting plan and determines that shared parenting would be in the best interest of the children. (2) In addition to a modification authorized under division (E)(1) of this section: (a) Both parents under a shared parenting decree jointly may modify the terms of the plan for shared parenting approved by the court and incorporated by it into the shared parenting decree. Modifications under this division may be made at any time. The modifications to the plan shall be filed jointly by both parents with the court, and the court shall include them in the plan, unless they are not in the best interest of the children. If the modifications are not in the best interests of the children, the court, in its discretion, may reject the modifications or make modifications to the proposed modifications or the plan that are in the best interest of the children. Modifications jointly submitted by both parents under a shared parenting decree shall be effective, either as originally filed or as modified by the court, upon their inclusion by the court in the plan. Modifications to the plan made by the court shall be effective upon their inclusion by the court in the plan. (b) The court may modify the terms of the plan for shared parenting approved by the court and incorporated by it into the shared parenting decree upon its own motion at any time if the court determines that the modifications are in the best interest of the children or upon the request of one or both of the parents under the decree. Modifications under this division may be made at any time. The court shall not make any modification to the plan under this division, unless the modification is in the best interest of the children. (c) The court may terminate a prior final shared parenting decree that includes a shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(i) of this section upon the request of one or both of the parents or whenever it determines that shared parenting is not in the best interest of the children. The court may terminate a prior final shared parenting decree that includes a shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section if it determines, upon its own motion or upon the request of one or both parents, that shared parenting is not in the best interest of the children. If modification of the terms of the plan for shared parenting approved by the court and incorporated by it into the final shared parenting decree is attempted under division (E)(2)(a) of this section and the court rejects the modifications, it may terminate the final shared parenting decree if it determines that shared parenting is not in the best interest of the children. (d) Upon the termination of a prior final shared parenting decree under division (E)(2)(c) of this section, the court shall proceed and issue a modified decree for the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children under the standards applicable under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section as if no decree for shared parenting had been granted and as if no request for shared parenting ever had been made. (F)(1) In determining the best interest of a child pursuant to this section, whether on an original decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children or a modification of a decree allocating those rights and responsibilities, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to: (a) The wishes of the child's parents regarding the child's care; (b) If the court has interviewed the child in chambers pursuant to division (B) of this section regarding the child's wishes and concerns as to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities concerning the child, the wishes and concerns of the child, as expressed to the court; (c) The child's interaction and interrelationship with the child's parents, siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the child's best interest; (d) The child's adjustment to the child's home, school, and community; (e) The mental and physical health of all persons involved in the situation; (f) The parent more likely to honor and facilitate court-approved parenting time rights or visitation and companionship rights; (g) Whether either parent has failed to make all child support payments, including all arrearages, that are required of that parent pursuant to a child support order under which that parent is an obligor; (h) Whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; whether either parent, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that is the basis of an adjudication; whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the current proceeding; whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the current proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense; and whether there is reason to believe that either parent has acted in a manner resulting in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; (i) Whether the residential parent or one of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree has continuously and willfully denied the other parent's right to parenting time in accordance with an order of the court; (j) Whether either parent has established a residence, or is planning to establish a residence, outside this state. (2) In determining whether shared parenting is in the best interest of the children, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the factors enumerated in division (F)(1) of this section, the factors enumerated in section 3119.23 of the Revised Code, and all of the following factors: (a) The ability of the parents to cooperate and make decisions jointly, with respect to the children; (b) The ability of each parent to encourage the sharing of love, affection, and contact between the child and the other parent; (c) Any history of, or potential for, child abuse, spouse abuse, other domestic violence, or parental kidnapping by either parent; (d) The geographic proximity of the parents to each other, as the proximity relates to the practical considerations of shared parenting; (e) The recommendation of the guardian ad litem of the child, if the child has a guardian ad litem. (3) When allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children, the court shall not give preference to a parent because of that parent's financial status or condition. (4) When allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children, the court shall not consider a parent's act of affirming a child's sex as contrary to the best interest of the child. (G) Either parent or both parents of any children may file a pleading or motion with the court requesting the court to grant both parents shared parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children in a proceeding held pursuant to division (A) of this section. If a pleading or motion requesting shared parenting is filed, the parent or parents filing the pleading or motion also shall file with the court a plan for the exercise of shared parenting by both parents. If each parent files a pleading or motion requesting shared parenting but only one parent files a plan or if only one parent files a pleading or motion requesting shared parenting and also files a plan, the other parent as ordered by the court shall file with the court a plan for the exercise of shared parenting by both parents. The plan for shared parenting shall be filed with the petition for dissolution of marriage, if the question of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children arises out of an action for dissolution of marriage, or, in other cases, at a time at least thirty days prior to the hearing on the issue of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children. A plan for shared parenting shall include provisions covering all factors that are relevant to the care of the children, including, but not limited to, provisions covering factors such as physical living arrangements, child support obligations, provision for the children's medical and dental care, school placement, and the parent with which the children will be physically located during legal holidays, school holidays, and other days of special importance. (H) If an appeal is taken from a decision of a court that grants or modifies a decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children, the court of appeals shall give the case calendar priority and handle it expeditiously. (I)(1) Upon receipt of an order for active military service in the uniformed services, a parent who is subject to an order allocating parental rights and responsibilities or in relation to whom an action to allocate parental rights and responsibilities is pending and who is ordered for active military service shall notify the other parent who is subject to the order or in relation to whom the case is pending of the order for active military service within three days of receiving the military service order. (2) On receipt of the notice described in division (I)(1) of this section, either parent may apply to the court for a hearing to expedite an allocation or modification proceeding so that the court can issue an order before the parent's active military service begins. The application shall include the date on which the active military service begins. The court shall schedule a hearing upon receipt of the application and hold the hearing not later than thirty days after receipt of the application, except that the court shall give the case calendar priority and handle the case expeditiously if exigent circumstances exist in the case. The court shall not modify a prior decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities unless the court determines that there has been a change in circumstances of the child, the child's residential parent, or either of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree, and that modification is necessary to serve the best interest of the child. The court shall not find past, present, or possible future active military service in the uniformed services to constitute a change in circumstances justifying modification of a prior decree pursuant to division (E) of this section. The court shall make specific written findings of fact to support any modification under this division. (3) Nothing in division (I) of this section shall prevent a court from issuing a temporary order allocating or modifying parental rights and responsibilities for the duration of the parent's active military service. A temporary order shall specify whether the parent's active military service is the basis of the order and shall provide for termination of the temporary order and resumption of the prior order within ten days after receipt of notice pursuant to division (I)(5) of this section, unless the other parent demonstrates that resumption of the prior order is not in the child's best interest. (4) At the request of a parent who is ordered for active military service in the uniformed services and who is a subject of a proceeding pertaining to a temporary order for the allocation or modification of parental rights and responsibilities, the court shall permit the parent to participate in the proceeding and present evidence by electronic means, including communication by telephone, video, or internet to the extent permitted by the rules of the supreme court of Ohio. (5) A parent who is ordered for active military service in the uniformed services and who is a subject of a proceeding pertaining to the allocation or modification of parental rights and responsibilities shall provide written notice to the court, child support enforcement agency, and the other parent of the date of termination of the parent's active military service not later than thirty days after the date on which the service ends. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Abused child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.031 of the Revised Code. (2) "Active military service" means service by a member of the uniformed services in compliance with military orders to report for combat operations, contingency operations, peacekeeping operations, a remote tour of duty, or other active service for which the member is required to report unaccompanied by any family member, including any period of illness, recovery from injury, leave, or other lawful absence during that operation, duty, or service. (3) "Affirming a child's sex" has the same meaning as in section 3129.10 of the Revised Code. (4) "Neglected child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.03 of the Revised Code. (4)(5) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (5)(6) "Uniformed services" means the United States armed forces, the army national guard, and the air national guard or any reserve component thereof, or the commissioned corps of the United States public health service. (K) As used in the Revised Code, "shared parenting" means that the parents share, in the manner set forth in the plan for shared parenting that is approved by the court under division (D)(1) and described in division (L)(6) of this section, all or some of the aspects of physical and legal care of their children. (L) For purposes of the Revised Code: (1) A parent who is granted the care, custody, and control of a child under an order that was issued pursuant to this section prior to April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting has "custody of the child" and "care, custody, and control of the child" under the order, and is the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child under the order. (2) A parent who primarily is allocated the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and who is designated as the residential parent and legal custodian of the child under an order that is issued pursuant to this section on or after April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting has "custody of the child" and "care, custody, and control of the child" under the order, and is the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child under the order. (3) A parent who is not granted custody of a child under an order that was issued pursuant to this section prior to April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting is the "parent who is not the residential parent," the "parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian," or the "noncustodial parent" of the child under the order. (4) A parent who is not primarily allocated the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and who is not designated as the residential parent and legal custodian of the child under an order that is issued pursuant to this section on or after April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting is the "parent who is not the residential parent," the "parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian," or the "noncustodial parent" of the child under the order. (5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, if an order is issued by a court pursuant to this section and the order provides for shared parenting of a child, both parents have "custody of the child" or "care, custody, and control of the child" under the order, to the extent and in the manner specified in the order. (6) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise and except as otherwise provided in the order, if an order is issued by a court pursuant to this section and the order provides for shared parenting of a child, each parent, regardless of where the child is physically located or with whom the child is residing at a particular point in time, as specified in the order, is the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child. (7) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise and except as otherwise provided in the order, a designation in the order of a parent as the residential parent for the purpose of determining the school the child attends, as the custodial parent for purposes of claiming the child as a dependent pursuant to section 152(e) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended, or as the residential parent for purposes of receiving public assistance pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section, does not affect the designation pursuant to division (L)(6) of this section of each parent as the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child. (M) The court shall require each parent of a child to file an affidavit attesting as to whether the parent, and the members of the parent's household, have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the offenses identified in divisions (C) and (F)(1)(h) of this section. Sec. 3109.054. (A) When allocating parental rights and responsibilities or parenting time, no court shall deny or limit a parent's parental rights and responsibilities or parenting time based on the parent's decision to do any of the following: (A)(1) Refer to and raise the child in a manner consistent with the child's biological sex or affirm the child's sex; (B)(2) Decline to consent to the child receiving gender transition services as defined in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code; (C)(3) Decline to consent to the child receiving counseling or other mental health services for the purpose of affirming the child's perception of the child's gender or sex, if the child's perception is inconsistent with the child's biological sex. (B) "Affirm the child's sex" has the same meaning as in section 3129.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3129.01. As used in this chaptersections 3129.01 to 3129.06 of the Revised Code: (A) "Biological sex," "birth sex," and "sex" mean the a person's biological indication of sex, either male and or female, including sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at birth, without regard to an individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience of gender as those terms are defined in section 3129.10 of the Revised Code. (B) "Cross-sex hormone" means testosterone, estrogen, or progesterone given to a minor individual in an amount greater than would normally be produced endogenously in a healthy individual of the minor individual's age and sex. (C) "Female" means, when referring to a natural person, anyone who naturally has, had, will have, or would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. (D) "Gender reassignment surgery" means any surgery performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with gender transition that seeks to surgically alter or remove healthy physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are typical for the individual's biological sex, in order to instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics that resemble a sex different from the individual's birth sex, including genital or non-genital gender reassignment surgery. (D)(E) "Gender-related condition" means any condition where an individual feels an incongruence between the individual's gender identity and biological sex. "Gender-related condition" includes gender dysphoria. (E)(F) "Gender transition" means the process in which an individual goes from identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to his or her biological sex to identifying with and living as a gender different from his or her biological sex, including social, legal, or physical changes. (F)(G) "Gender transition services" means any medical or surgical service (including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital services, or prescription drugs or hormones) provided for the purpose of assisting an individual with gender transition that seeks to alter or remove physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are typical for the individual's biological sex, or to instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics that resemble a sex different from the individual's birth sex, including medical services that provide puberty blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or other mechanisms to promote the development of feminizing or masculinizing features in the opposite sex, or genital or non-genital gender reassignment surgery. (G)(H) "Genital gender reassignment surgery" means surgery performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with gender transition and includes both of the following: (1) Surgeries that sterilize, such as castration, vasectomy, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, orchiectomy, and penectomy; (2) Surgeries that artificially construct tissue with the appearance of genitalia that differs from the individual's biological sex, such as metoidiplasty, phalloplasty, and vaginoplasty. (H)(I) "Male" means, when referring to a natural person, anyone who naturally has, had, will have, or would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. (J) "Mental health professional" means all of the following: (1) Either of the following advanced practice registered nurses who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code that authorizes the practice of nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse: (a) A clinical nurse specialist who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health CNS by the American nurses credentialing center; (b) A certified nurse practitioner who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health NP by the American nurses credentialing center. (2) A physician specializing in psychiatry; (3) A psychologist, school psychologist, or independent school psychologist licensed under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code or under rules adopted in accordance with sections 3301.07 and 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (4) An independent social worker, social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed professional counselor, independent marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code. (I)(K) "Minor individual" means an individual under eighteen years of age. (J)(L) "Non-genital gender reassignment surgery" means surgery performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with gender transition such as augmentation mammoplasty, facial feminization surgery, liposuction, lipofilling, voice surgery, thyroid cartilage reduction, gluteal augmentation, pectoral implants, or other aesthetic procedures. (K)(M) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (L)(N) "Puberty-blocking drugs" means Gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogs or other synthetic drugs used to stop luteinizing hormone and follicle stimulating hormone secretion, synthetic antiandrogen drugs used to block the androgen receptor, or any drug to delay or suppress normal puberty. Sec. 3129.10. As used in sections 3129.10 to 3129.351 of the Revised Code: (A) "Affirmation of a minor child's sex," "affirmed a minor child's sex," "affirming a minor child's sex," "affirm a minor child's sex," or "affirms a minor child's sex" means guiding, instructing, raising, or referring to, or intending to guide, instruct, raise, or refer to, a minor child in a manner consistent with the minor child's sex and making decisions for the purpose of protecting the minor child's bodily integrity, development, and emotional and mental health, including all of the following: (1) Using the minor child's legal name, referring to the minor child with pronouns consistent with the minor child's sex, or refraining from using a name or pronouns inconsistent with the minor child's sex; (2) Seeking out and consenting to any lawful mental health service for the minor child to assist the child in living consistent with the child's sex; (3) Declining to consent to any medical or surgical gender transition services, as defined in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code, for the minor child; (4) Declining to consent to any physical or mental health services for the minor child for the purpose of gender transition as defined in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Female," "male," and "sex" have the same meanings as in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 of the Revised Code. (D) "Minor child" means an individual who is under eighteen years of age. (E) "Parental alienation" means a mental and emotional state in which, without a valid reason, a minor child does both of the following: (1) Rejects a fit parent, guardian, or legal custodian; (2) Allies strongly with another parent or an individual or group of individuals who do not have legal custody or control over the minor, sometimes referred to as "chosen family." (F) "Political subdivision" means municipal corporations, townships, counties, school districts, and all other bodies corporate and politic responsible for governmental activities only in geographic areas smaller than that of the state. "Political subdivision" includes a county department of job and family services or public children services agency. (G) "Professional child welfare training" means educational and training services, materials, and curricula for employees, contractors, agents, or volunteers who work with at-risk or abused or neglected children and youth, including educational and training services, materials, and curricula designed for public children services agencies, private child placing agencies and any other foster care or adoption agencies, mental health professionals, school districts, courts, attorneys, and guardians ad litem. (H) "State" means the state of Ohio, including the general assembly, the supreme court, courts of appeals, the offices of all elected state officers, and all departments, boards, offices, commissions, agencies, institutions, and other political subdivisions or instrumentalities of the state of Ohio, including a state institution of higher education and any state employee, or any contractor, volunteer, or other person acting as an agent of the state. (I) "State agency" or "agency" means any organized agency, board, body, commission, department, institution, office, or other entity established by the laws of the state for the exercise of any function of state government, including any state employee, or any contractor, volunteer, or other person acting as an agent of the state. Sec. 3129.11. In accordance with section 2151.032 of the Revised Code, no public children services agency shall entertain or investigate a report of child abuse or child neglect under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code if the sole basis for the report is the affirmation of a minor child's sex by a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver. If a report of child abuse or child neglect includes a claim that a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver affirmed a minor child's sex in addition to other claims, the affirmation of a minor child's sex shall not serve as the basis for an investigation of a complaint of abuse or neglect under section 2151.27 of the Revised Code or for the removal of the minor child from the parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver. Sec. 3129.12. In no event shall a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver's act of affirming a minor child's sex serve as a basis for the state or a state agency to do any of the following: (A) Prevent the return of a minor child to the minor child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver, including in either of the following circumstances: (1) The parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver has sought or consented to inpatient or outpatient treatment for the minor child's self-harm or the risk or threat of self-harm. (2) The minor child, while in inpatient or outpatient treatment, has been referred to or treated in a manner inconsistent with the minor child's sex. (B) Limit the parent, guardian, or legal custodian's authority to make physical or mental health care decisions for, or have physical access to, a minor child receiving inpatient or outpatient treatment; (C) Limit or waive a parent, guardian, or legal custodian's right to be informed of and consent to or refuse a minor child's participation in any research or study. Sec. 3129.13. The state and any state agency shall not require a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver to consent to or facilitate social or medical, including surgical, interventions counter to affirming a minor child's sex. Sec. 3129.14. (A) It is the public policy of this state that a parent has the fundamental right to make decisions concerning the upbringing, education, and care of the parent's minor child, including the right to affirm the minor child's sex. (B) The state and any state agency shall not do any of the following: (1) Take any adverse action against a parent, guardian, or legal custodian for affirming the sex of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian's minor child; (2) Require a parent, guardian, or legal custodian to deny, or to refrain from affirming, the sex of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian's minor child; (3) Impose any limitations on the right and authority of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian to make physical or mental health care decisions for, or have physical access to, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian's minor child; (4) Withhold any information concerning a minor child's mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being from the minor child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, including information related to the child's claim or request to identify in a way that does not correspond to the child's sex; (5) Directly or indirectly encourage a minor child to withhold information concerning the minor child's mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being from the minor child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, including information related to the child's claim or request to identify in a way that does not correspond to the child's sex; (6) Aid or abet a minor child to run away from a fit parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver; (7) Change a minor child's name or pronouns in the child's educational, medical, or state records without the permission of the minor child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. Sec. 3129.15. The state and any state agency shall not do any of the following: (A) Take any adverse action against a prospective or current foster caregiver, adoptive parent, or kinship caregiver for affirming the sex of a minor child under the prospective or current care of the caregiver or adoptive parent; (B) Deny the placement of a minor child with a prospective or current foster caregiver, adoptive parent, or kinship caregiver, or remove a minor child from the custody or care of a foster caregiver, adoptive parent, or kinship caregiver, solely on the basis of the prospective or current caregiver or adoptive parent affirming a minor child's sex; (C) Require a prospective or current foster caregiver, adoptive parent, or kinship caregiver to deny, or to refrain from affirming, the sex of a minor child under the prospective or current care of the caregiver or adoptive parent. Sec. 3129.21. (A) The state, any political subdivision thereof, and any state agency shall not use any state funds or contract with any entity or conduct any educational or training program for any employees, contractors, agents, or volunteers of the state or any political subdivision thereof for training, educational materials, or curricula that characterize the act of affirming a minor child's sex as abuse, neglect, creating a risk of abuse or neglect, or creating an unsafe environment. (B) No employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any state agency acting in a supervisory capacity shall, while serving in an official capacity or using state funds, train any individual serving the state under the employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer's supervision to characterize the act of affirming a minor child's sex as abuse, neglect, creating a risk of abuse or neglect, or creating an unsafe environment. (C) No training of any employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any state agency, including a court appointed special advocate, guardian ad litem, foster caregiver, and adoptive parent, shall, while serving in a capacity representing the state or using state funds to carry out that service, characterize the act of affirming a minor child's sex as abuse, neglect, creating a risk of abuse or neglect, or creating an unsafe environment. Sec. 3129.211. Any entity that contracts with the state, any political subdivision thereof, or a state agency to provide professional child welfare training for employees, contractors, agents, or volunteers of the state, any political subdivision thereof, or a state agency shall provide the following certification as part of the contract: "[Entity name] certifies that the organization as well as its employees and contractors shall, during the term of this contract, while receiving state funds or carrying out duties as contracted by [the state, political subdivision, or state agency], provide no instruction, training, materials, or curricula to any employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state or any political subdivision thereof stating or suggesting that: (1) The act of affirming a minor's sex constitutes abuse or neglect, creates a risk of abuse or neglect, or creates an unsafe environment; (2) Gender transition for a minor is a sound evidence-based treatment for gender dysphoria or that gender transition reduces the risk of suicide in minors struggling with gender dysphoria; (3) Psychological and mental health treatment that affirms a child's sex constitutes conversion therapy; or (4) Parents, guardians, legal custodians, and other adult caretakers of minors place children struggling with gender dysphoria at risk of self-harm if they affirm the child's sex." Sec. 3129.22. (A) The state, any political subdivision thereof, and any state agency shall not enter into any contract or use any state funds for any services, including for training, educational materials, or programming to minor children, that characterize the act of affirming a minor child's sex as abuse, neglect, creating a risk of abuse or neglect, or creating an unsafe environment. (B) A violation of this section by any individual or entity with whom the state or any political subdivision thereof has contracted shall result in loss of the contract and loss of eligibility for funding or future contracts. Sec. 3129.23. (A) No state regulatory entity may require as a condition of licensure or certification that any individual, organization, or agency that works with minor children refer to or treat a minor child in a manner that is inconsistent with the minor child's sex or deny care that affirms a minor child's sex. (B) A violation of this section shall result in the loss of the certification or licensure of the responsible individual. Sec. 3129.24. A parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver's act of affirming a minor child's sex shall not serve as a basis to withhold information or require the concealment of information about a minor child from the minor child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver in any policy or action implemented by the state or any political subdivision thereof, including any employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state or political subdivision thereof. Sec. 3129.25. (A) No employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state or any political subdivision thereof shall, in the course of the individual's actions or work involving minor children, be required to deny or not affirm a minor child's sex. (B) The state or any political subdivision thereof shall not engage in retaliatory action in relation to the act of affirming a minor child's sex by an employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer. Sec. 3129.26. The state, any political subdivision thereof, any state agency, or any employee, agent, contractor, or volunteer thereof, shall not do any of the following on behalf of the state or with state funds: (A) Solicit personal information or statements from a minor related to the minor child's perception of the minor child's sexual orientation or gender identity, without the express written permission of the minor child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian or a court order; (B) Establish or maintain a system of surveillance or monitoring of parents, guardians, legal custodians, and kinship caregivers on the basis of a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver affirming a minor child's sex, including any database of parents, guardians, legal custodians, or kinship caregivers or other system that compiles and stores such information; (C) Establish or maintain a system of surveillance or monitoring of minor children on the basis of a minor child's perception of the minor child's sexual orientation or gender identity, including any database of minor children or other similar system that compiles and stores such information, with the exception of legal research settings if express written permission has been obtained from a minor child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; (D) Require or solicit a minor child to submit to a survey, analysis, or evaluation that reveals information concerning the minor child's sex, behavior, attitudes, orientation, or perceived identity without the prior written consent of the minor child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian or a court order. Sec. 3129.30. The following certifications and reports shall be provided to the governor, the general assembly, and the attorney general and be made available in a publicly accessible document at the end of each fiscal year: (A) The director of children and youth shall certify compliance with sections 3129.14, 3129.15, and 3129.24 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of administrative services shall do both of the following: (1) Report any loss of contracts as a result of a violation of section 3129.22 of the Revised Code; (2) Certify compliance with section 3129.25 of the Revised Code. (C) Each state agency, court, state institution of higher education, county department of job and family services, and public children services agency that conducts educational or training programs related to working with minor children or oversees such training shall certify compliance with section 3129.21 of the Revised Code. (D) Each board, commission, or agency created under or by virtue of Title XLVII of the Revised Code and such other boards, commissions, and agencies as the director of the legislative service commission determines are regulating occupations and professions shall certify that all certifications, accreditations, and licenses have complied with section 3129.23 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3129.301. Each state agency that is required to provide certification under section 3129.30 of the Revised Code shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the certification requirements, including mechanisms for establishing reporting requirements to the agency in order to fulfill the agency's requirements under section 3129.30 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3129.35. (A) A parent, guardian, legal custodian, or minor child or an employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state or any political subdivision thereof may initiate a private cause of action against any employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state, agency, institution, or entity that violates section 3129.11, 3129.12, 3129.13, 3129.14, 3129.15, 3129.21, 3129.24, 3129.25, 3129.26, or 3129.30 of the Revised Code if the violation pertains to that individual. (B) The court may award damages and equitable relief as determined to be justified, as well as reasonable attorney's fees and court costs, to a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or minor child, or to an employee, contractor, agent, or volunteer of the state, agency, institution, or entity that prevails in an action under division (A) of this section. Sec. 3129.351. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, the state and any political subdivision thereof waives its immunity from liability and consents to be sued, and have its liability determined, in any court of competent jurisdiction in accordance with the same rules of law otherwise applicable to suits between private parties in any private cause of action initiated under division (A) of section 3129.35 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4743.15. Each board, commission, or agency created under or by virtue of Title XLVII of the Revised Code and such other boards, commissions, and agencies as the director of the legislative service commission determines are regulating occupations and professions shall comply with section 3129.23 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2151.412, 2151.426, 3109.04, 3109.054, and 3129.01 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. (A) It is the intent of the General Assembly to maintain the long-established constitutional rights of parents to raise, protect, and nurture their children, and to protect children, families, and those who work with them from the harms of wrongful determinations of abuse. (B) The General Assembly hereby finds and declares all of the following: Parents possess by law the fundamental right to raise their children and by nature and nurture the greatest love and knowledge of that child. The Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution protects the right of parents to direct the care, upbringing, education, and welfare of their children. The Supreme Court of the United States has held that "the Due Process Clause does not permit a State to infringe on the fundamental right of parents to make childrearing decisions simply because a state judge believes a 'better' decision could be made." Troxel v. Granville, 530 U.S. 57, at 72-73 (plurality op.). The Supreme Court has recognized that a state's notion of what may be "thought to be in the children's best interest," without some "showing of unfitness" on the part of parents, offends the Due Process Clause of the Constitution. Quilloin v. Walcott, 434 U.S. 246, 255 (1978). The Supreme Court has held that "[t]he statist notion that governmental power should supersede parental authority in all cases because some parents abuse and neglect children is repugnant to American tradition. Simply because the decision of a parent is not agreeable to a child or because it involves risks does not automatically transfer the power to make that decision from the parents to some agency or officer of the state." Parham v. J.R., 442 U.S. 584, 603 (1979). A parent's fundamental right to direct the care and upbringing of his or her child includes raising, treating, referring to, and caring for the child in a manner consistent with the child's sex. It is contrary to the best interests of children for the state to remove a child from fit and loving parents simply for raising the child in a manner consistent with the child's biological sex. State child protection systems have wrongfully removed children from the custody of fit and loving parents for refraining from social measures or from medical or surgical procedures that attempt to affirm a child's feelings of incongruence with the child's biological sex. Child gender transition is an experimental, high-risk process which can turn a physically healthy child into a lifelong medical patient. As established in multiple systematic evidence reviews, including a report published by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in 2025 entitled "Treatment for Pediatric Gender Dysphoria: Review of Evidence and Best Practices" and a report published in 2024 that was commissioned by National Health Service England and National Health Service Improvement entitled "Cass Review," child gender transition is not supported by evidenced-based medicine or science. The concept of a gender identity, often defined circularly as "an internal sense of gender," or an "authentic self" dissociated from biological reality is neither scientific nor evidence-based, but a dubious metaphysical premise grounded in tendentious gender ideology. No sound scientific evidence justifies pediatric gender transition, much less removal of a child by the state from the child's parents for the purpose of enforcing such a transition. Removing a child from the child's home and family creates trauma for the child and damages familial bonds. Except in cases of actual abuse, neglect, or endangerment, removing a child from the child's home exposes the child to greater risks in state care, including well-documented, vastly higher rates of lifelong harm from sexual assault, human trafficking, and drug use. A growing number of educational and professional institutions wrongly train personnel of legal and child protection systems to treat as abuse a parent's choice to refrain from social, medical, or surgical procedures that affirm a child's feelings of incongruence with the child's biological sex. A growing number of certification, licensing, and accreditation bodies for health care, legal, and social work professionals wrongly require adherence to the unquestioning and precipitous gender transition of children. A growing number of individuals and organizations working with children in legal, educational, and health care settings act in ways that alienate children from the children's parents and families, and from the children's parents' and families' sincerely held convictions and religious beliefs. Parental alienation is a well-documented cause of emotional distress and trauma in children, and is contrary to the best interest of the child. It is contrary to sound policy and to the best interest of a child under the custody of the state to bar individuals from fostering or adopting children solely on the grounds of moral convictions and religious beliefs concerning sexuality and biological sex. Thousands of such families have been barred by states from fostering or adopting children, thus depriving children in desperate need of safe and loving homes. Histories of trauma and abuse correlate strongly with dissociative beliefs. It is contrary to the best interest of a child victim in the custody of the state to limit foster care or adoptive placement to families who will reinforce a child's dissociation from the child's body. No child should be reduced to the child's feelings about the child's body, but should be supported in addressing confusion and distress in a manner that does not harm the child. Protecting a child's development, health, bodily integrity, and open future is of paramount importance and constitutes a legitimate state interest. Raising a girl as a girl or a boy as a boy is never abuse. Section 4. Sections 3129.10 to 3129.351 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, shall be known as the Affirming Families First Act.